Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-236
Airport and air navigational facility; laws governing; jurisdiction.

Every airport and other air navigation facility controlled and operated by any municipality, or jointly controlled and operated pursuant to the provisions of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502, shall, subject to federal and state laws, rules, and regulations, be under the exclusive jurisdiction and control of the municipality or municipalities controlling and operating it and no other municipality in which such airport or air navigation facility shall have any police jurisdiction of the same or any authority to charge or exact any license fees or occupation taxes for the operations thereon. Such municipality or municipalities shall have concurrent jurisdiction over the adjacent territory described in subdivision (2) of section 3-215.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 14, p. 169.